Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-321
Reports and fees; exemptions.

All banking, insurance, and building and loan association corporations
paying fees and making reports to the Director
of Insurance or the Director of Banking and Finance and all other
corporations paying an occupation tax to the state under any other statutory
provisions than those of sections 21-301 to 21-330 shall be exempt from
the provisions of such sections.

Laws 1913, c. 240, § 21, p. 752;

R.S.1913, § 781;

C.S.1922, § 699;

C.S.1929, § 24-1721;

R.S.1943, § 21-321;

Laws 1969, c. 124, § 8, p. 573;

Laws 1988, LB 800, § 5;

Laws 2003, LB 524, § 10;

Laws 2014, LB749, § 251.